Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-306
General provisions of irrigation law applicable.

All general provisions of the law of this state pertaining to the acquisition, construction, management, control, and payment of the cost of property and works of irrigation districts, including the levy and collection of taxes and assessments, shall be applicable, as nearly as may be, and except as herein otherwise expressly provided, to any and all electric light and power plants, lines and systems, constructed, purchased or otherwise acquired and operated under the provisions of sections 46-301 to 46-315.

Laws 1931, c. 91, § 6, p. 255;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 46-706;

R.S.1943, § 46-306.